Nevada, session 83, SB122.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 293.269923 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293.269923 1. Except as otherwise provided in [subsection
2,] this section, at the request of a voter whose mail ballot has been
prepared by or on behalf of the voter, a person authorized by the
voter may return the mail ballot on behalf of the voter by mail or
-
*SB122*

– 2 –
personal delivery to the county clerk, or any ballot drop box
established in the county, pursuant to NRS 293.269921. A person
shall not return a mail ballot on behalf of the voter unless the
person is a resident of this State. Any person who returns a mail
ballot on behalf of a voter must submit with the mail ballot an
affirmation, in the form prescribed by the Secretary of State, that:
(a) Attests that the person returning the mail ballot is a
resident of this State; and
(b) Is signed by the person under penalty of perjury.
2. Except for an election board officer in the course of the
election board officer’s official duties, a person shall not willfully:
(a) Impede, obstruct, prevent or interfere with the return of a
voter’s mail ballot;
(b) Deny a voter the right to return the voter’s mail ballot; or
(c) If the person receives the voter’s mail ballot and
authorization to return the mail ballot on behalf of the voter by mail
or personal delivery, fail to return the mail ballot, unless otherwise
authorized by the voter, by mail or personal delivery:
(1) Before the end of the third day after the day of receipt, if
the person receives the mail ballot from the voter four or more days
before the day of the election; or
(2) Before the deadline established by the United States
Postal Service for the mail ballot to be postmarked on the day of the
election or before the polls close on the day of the election, as
applicable to the type of delivery, if the person receives the mail
ballot from the voter three or fewer days before the day of the
election.
3. A person who violates any provision of subsection 2 is
guilty of a category E felony and shall be punished as provided in
NRS 193.130.
Sec. 2. NRS 293C.26323 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.26323 1. Except as otherwise provided in [subsection
2,] this section, at the request of a voter whose mail ballot has been
prepared by or on behalf of the voter, a person authorized by the
voter may return the mail ballot on behalf of the voter by mail or
personal delivery to the city clerk, or any ballot drop box established
in the city, pursuant to NRS 293C.26321. A person shall not return
a mail ballot on behalf of the voter unless the person is a resident
of this State. Any person who returns a mail ballot on behalf of a
voter must submit with the mail ballot an affirmation, in the form
prescribed by the Secretary of State, that:
(a) Attests that the person returning the mail ballot is a
resident of this State; and
(b) Is signed by the person under penalty of perjury.
-
*SB122*

– 3 –
2. Except for an election board officer in the course of the
election board officer’s official duties, a person shall not willfully:
(a) Impede, obstruct, prevent or interfere with the return of a
voter’s mail ballot;
(b) Deny a voter the right to return the voter’s mail ballot; or
(c) If the person receives the voter’s mail ballot and
authorization to return the mail ballot on behalf of the voter by mail
or personal delivery, fail to return the mail ballot, unless otherwise
authorized by the voter, by mail or personal delivery:
(1) Before the end of the third day after the day of receipt, if
the person receives the mail ballot from the voter four or more days
before the day of the election; or
(2) Before the deadline established by the United States
Postal Service for the mail ballot to be postmarked on the day of the
election or before the polls close on the day of the election, as
applicable to the type of delivery, if the person receives the mail
ballot from the voter three or fewer days before the day of the
election.
3. A person who violates any provision of subsection 2 is
guilty of a category E felony and shall be punished as provided in
NRS 193.130.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB122*